Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 3 Agricultural Statistics

Repealing clauses. —

Section 5, ch. 87, Laws 1925, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 1 et seq.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture § 5.

§ 11-3-101.
Duty of county assessors.

At the time of making
annual assessment of property, each county assessor shall collect
statistics in relation to farm products and agricultural resources
from each farm and ranch owner, operator or renter as called for by
the director. Necessary forms shall be furnished by the director,
but shall not duplicate questions in assessor’s schedules.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 87, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 5-501; C.S. 1945, § 34-401; W.S. 1957, § 11-18; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to duty of director of agriculture to compile agricultural statistics, see §

11-2-202

.

As to other duties of county assessors, see §

18-3-204

.

§ 11-3-102.
Disposition of forms.

The original forms upon
which statistics are gathered by the county assessor shall be returned
to the director immediately upon completion of the assessment work,
and not later than June 1 each year.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 87, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 5-502; C.S. 1945, § 34-402; W.S. 1957, § 11-19; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-3-103.
Reports confidential.

The reports made to the
director are confidential. The records of individuals, firms or corporations
supplying information called for by law shall not be used to disclose
personal or corporate affairs.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 87, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 5-503; C.S. 1945, § 34-403; W.S. 1957, § 11-20; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

§ 11-3-104.
Service to be performed under general assessment law.

The service performed
by the several assessors in the state shall be performed in connection
with their service under the general assessment law of the state and
as one of the regular duties devolving upon the county assessor’s
office. No extra compensation shall be allowed.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 87, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 5-504; C.S. 1945, § 34-404; W.S. 1957, § 11-21; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.